Hawaii, session 2025, SB1095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that numerous private organizations have attempted to amend existing law to enable special number plates with full-plate designs to raise revenue for their causes.  While successful in some cases, the legislature also finds that the county agencies responsible for issuing license plates bear significant burden contracting to produce new license plates each time a new license plate law is adopted. In addition, creating a full-plate design requires acquiring non-standard specialized license plates, which can cause complications with procurement and cost. The legislature further finds that existing law allows private organizations to apply for and have license plate designs based on decals added to standard license plates limited to three inches wide by three inches high, which can raise revenue for their causes, without having to change the law, or add burden to the counties. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to reduce the burden on organizations attempting to amend special number plate statutes and the counties attempting to implement special number plate requirements by expanding the existing decal size restrictions. SECTION 2.  Section 249-9.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) In lieu of the number plates contracted on behalf of the counties by the director of finance of the city and county of Honolulu, the county directors of finance shall issue special number plates to any organization in the State that meets the minimum standards and qualifications established under this section.  Organizations are authorized to retain the fees collected, less expenses, for the special number plates. The director of finance of the city and county of Honolulu, in consultation with the directors of finance of the counties of Kauai, Maui, and Hawaii, shall establish special design parameters and restrictions for decals or graphic representations affixable to special number plates; provided that the decal shall not be larger than [three] four inches wide by [three] four inches high." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.